Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF978.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: ARTICLE 1 LAWFUL SPORTS BETTING Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 240.01, subdivision 1b, is amended to read: Subd. 1b. Advance deposit wager. "Advance deposit wager" means a wager placed through an advance deposit wagering provider on a horse race deleted text begin that is conducted outside of the statedeleted text end . Sec. 2. new text begin [299L.10] DEFINITIONS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Terms. new text end new text begin For the purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the meanings given them. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Athletic event. new text end new text begin "Athletic event" means a sports game, match, or activity, or series of games, matches, activities, or tournaments involving the athletic skill of one or more players or participants. Athletic event does not include any of the following: new text end new text begin (1) horse racing as defined in section 240.01, subdivision 8; new text end new text begin (2) an esports or athletic competition, demonstration, activity, or tournament organized by an elementary, middle, or high school; by a public or private institution of higher education; or by any youth activity sports program, league, or clinic; new text end new text begin (3) a fantasy sports contest in which participants assemble teams of athletes or individuals and the winning outcome reflects the relative knowledge and skill of the participants and is determined predominantly by the accumulated statistical results of the performance of athletes or individuals in an actual event; or new text end new text begin (4) the performance of an individual athlete participating in a single game or match of a collegiate team. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Authorized participant. new text end new text begin "Authorized participant" means an individual who has a valid mobile sports betting account with a mobile betting operator and is at least 21 years of age. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Casino. new text end new text begin "Casino" means an establishment in which gaming is lawfully conducted by an Indian Tribe in the state of Minnesota pursuant to the Indian Gaming Regulatory Act and in accordance with a Tribal gaming ordinance and applicable Tribal-state compacts. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Class III gaming. new text end new text begin "Class III gaming" has the meaning given in United States Code, title 25, section 2703. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin College sports. new text end new text begin "College sports" means a sporting event in which at least one participant is a team or individual from a public or private institution of higher education. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Compact. new text end new text begin "Compact" means a Tribal-state compact governing the conduct of class III gaming on Indian lands that is negotiated under section 3.9221, any other state law, or pursuant to the Indian Gaming Regulatory Act, Public Law 100-497, and future amendments to it. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Esports events. new text end new text begin "Esports events" are leagues, competitive circuits, tournaments, or similar competitions where individuals or teams play video games typically for spectators either in-person or online for the purpose of entertainment, prizes, and money that meets the following conditions: new text end new text begin (1) the video game does not simulate the play of a game classified as Class I, II, or III under the Indian Gaming Regulatory Act, Public Law 100-497, and future amendments to it; and new text end new text begin (2) the video game is approved by the commissioner and publisher to be an event eligible for wagering. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Indian Tribe. new text end new text begin "Indian Tribe" means the following federally recognized Tribes and any instrumentality, political subdivision, legal entity, or other organization through which one of them conducts business: new text end new text begin (1) the Fond du Lac Band; new text end new text begin (2) the Grand Portage Band; new text end new text begin (3) the Mille Lacs Band; new text end new text begin (4) the White Earth Band; new text end new text begin (5) the Bois Forte Band; new text end new text begin (6) the Leech Lake Band; new text end new text begin (7) the Red Lake Nation; new text end new text begin (8) the Upper Sioux Community; new text end new text begin (9) the Lower Sioux Indian Community; new text end new text begin (10) the Shakopee Mdewakanton Sioux Community; and new text end new text begin (11) the Prairie Island Indian Community. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin In-game betting. new text end new text begin "In-game betting" means placing a mobile sports betting wager after a sporting event has started but before the outcome of the wager is determined. new text end new text begin Subd. 11. new text end new text begin Mobile application. new text end new text begin "Mobile application" means an application on a mobile phone or other device through which an individual is able to place a mobile sports betting wager. new text end new text begin Subd. 12. new text end new text begin Mobile sports betting. new text end new text begin "Mobile sports betting" means operating, conducting, or offering for play sports betting through the Internet. new text end new text begin Subd. 13. new text end new text begin Mobile sports betting account. new text end new text begin "Mobile sports betting account" means an electronic ledger in which all of the following types of transactions relative to an authorized participant are recorded: new text end new text begin (1) deposits and credits; new text end new text begin (2) withdrawals; new text end new text begin (3) mobile sports betting wagers; new text end new text begin (4) monetary value of winnings; new text end new text begin (5) service or other transaction related charges authorized by the authorized participant, if any; new text end new text begin (6) adjustments to the account; new text end new text begin (7) promotional activity; and new text end new text begin (8) responsible gaming parameters. new text end new text begin Subd. 14. new text end new text begin Mobile sports betting operator. new text end new text begin "Mobile sports betting operator" means an Indian Tribe that receives a license from the commissioner to operate, conduct, or offer for play mobile sports betting under this section to section 299L.80. new text end new text begin Subd. 15. new text end new text begin Mobile sports betting platform. new text end new text begin "Mobile sports betting platform" means an integrated system of hardware, software, or applications, including mobile applications and servers, through which a mobile sports betting operator operates, conducts, or offers sports betting through the Internet. new text end new text begin Subd. 16. new text end new text begin Mobile sports betting platform provider. new text end new text begin "Mobile sports betting platform provider" means a sports betting supplier that contracts with a mobile sports betting operator to provide a mobile sports betting platform. new text end new text begin Subd. 17. new text end new text begin Participant in a sporting event. new text end new text begin "Participant in a sporting event" means a person engaging in a sporting event as a player, coach, or official, or who is an owner or officer of a team engaging in a sporting event or the league or organization organizing the sporting event. new text end new text begin Subd. 18. new text end new text begin Sporting event. new text end new text begin "Sporting event" means an athletic event, esports event, or other event approved by the commissioner to be an event eligible for wagering under this section to section 299L.80. new text end new text begin Subd. 19. new text end new text begin Sports betting. new text end new text begin (a) "Sports betting" means wagering on the outcome of a sporting event or portions thereof or individual performance statistics therein that is: new text end new text begin (1) organized by a professional sports organization, internationally recognized sports organization, or amateur sports organization; and new text end new text begin (2) approved by the commissioner to be an event eligible for wagering under this act. new text end new text begin (b) Sports betting includes but is not limited to single-game bets; futures bets; teaser bets; parlay bets; over-under bets; money line bets; proposition bets; straight bets; exchange wagering; futures bets placed on end of the season standings, awards, or statistics; and any other bets approved by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (c) A contract for insurance on the life or health of a participant in a sporting event is not sports betting regulated under this section to section 299L.80. new text end new text begin (d) A private social bet as described in section 609.75, subdivision 3, clause (5), is not sports betting regulated under this section to section 299L.80. new text end new text begin (e) A sports-themed tipboard as described in section 349.12, subdivision 34, is not sports betting regulated under this section to section 299L.80. new text end new text begin Subd. 20. new text end new text begin Sports betting supplier. new text end new text begin "Sports betting supplier" means a person that, either directly or indirectly, provides mobile sports betting operators with services, goods, software, or any other product or information necessary to conduct sports betting or determine the outcome of wagers, including a person who provides data feeds and odds services, risk management providers, and integrity monitoring providers. Sports betting supplier does not include a sports governing body that provides raw statistical match data. new text end new text begin Subd. 21. new text end new text begin Sports governing body. new text end new text begin "Sports governing body" means an organization that prescribes and enforces final rules and codes of conduct for a sporting event and participants engaged in the sport. For an esport, "sports governing body" means the video game publisher of the title used in the esports competition. new text end new text begin Subd. 22. new text end new text begin Wager. new text end new text begin "Wager" means a transaction between an individual and a licensed mobile sports betting operator in which an individual pays, deposits, or risks cash or a cash equivalent during sports betting on an uncertain outcome of a sporting event. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [299L.11] SCOPE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Lawful mobile sports betting. new text end new text begin A person 21 years of age or older may participate in mobile sports betting within the state provided the person places all wagers with an entity licensed under sections 299L.10 to 299L.80 and is not disqualified, prohibited, or excluded from placing a wager on a sporting event. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Unlawful sports betting. new text end new text begin It is unlawful to wager on a sporting event, or engage in sports betting except in compliance with the terms, conditions, limitations, and restrictions of sections 299L.10 to 299L.80 or the rules adopted under those sections, other than class III sports betting conducted by an Indian Tribe pursuant to a Tribal-state compact. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Inapplicability to sports betting on Indian lands. new text end new text begin Sections 299L.10 to 299L.80, except for any provisions authorizing the negotiations of Tribal-state compacts, do not apply to sports betting conducted exclusively on Indian lands by an Indian Tribe conducted pursuant to a Tribal gaming ordinance approved by the National Indian Gaming Commission and a Tribal-state compact. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin [299L.15] POWERS AND DUTIES OF COMMISSIONER. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Regulate sports betting. new text end new text begin The commissioner has the power and duty to regulate mobile sports betting authorized under sections 299L.10 to 299L.80. In making rules, establishing policy, and regulating mobile sports betting, the commissioner shall: new text end new text begin (1) ensure that mobile sports betting is conducted in a fair and lawful manner; new text end new text begin (2) promote public safety and welfare; and new text end new text begin (3) ensure that mobile sports betting is conducted in a manner that is transparent to authorized participants. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Rulemaking. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner may adopt and enforce rules that are consistent with sections 299L.10 to 299L.80 and address the following subjects: new text end new text begin (1) the manner in which wagers are accepted and payouts are remitted, except the commissioner shall not promulgate a regulation setting a minimum hold requirement; new text end new text begin (2) the manner in which betting lines are communicated to the public; new text end new text begin (3) the method of accounting to be used by mobile sports betting operators; new text end new text begin (4) the types of records that shall be kept by mobile sports betting operators, mobile sports betting platform providers, and sports betting suppliers; new text end new text begin (5) the testing and auditing requirements for licensees, including requirements related to mobile sports betting accounts; new text end new text begin (6) the creation, funding, and use of mobile sports betting accounts, debit cards, and checks by authorized participants provided that the rules permit an authorized participant to fund a mobile sports betting account through a bonus or promotion, electronic bank transfer, an online or mobile payment system that supports online money transfers, a reloadable or prepaid card, and any other appropriate means approved by the commissioner but must not allow the use of credit cards or other methods by which payment can be made on credit, such as electronic wallets; new text end new text begin (7) the appropriate standards and practices to prevent and address gambling disorders; new text end new text begin (8) the appropriate standards and practices to prevent and address sports betting by individuals who are not authorized participants or who are otherwise disqualified, prohibited, or excluded from placing a wager on a sporting event; new text end new text begin (9) the sporting events on which wagers are authorized to be placed; new text end new text begin (10) the requirements for obtaining and retaining mobile sports betting operator licenses, mobile sports betting platform provider licenses, and sports wagering supplier licenses, including requirements for criminal and financial background checks, financial disclosure and auditing requirements, data practices and security requirements, bonding or other surety requirements, and the conduct of inspections; new text end new text begin (11) the requirements for mobile sports betting platform provider licensees to provide equipment and supplies used in sports betting; new text end new text begin (12) the requirements for sports wagering supplier licensees to provide services, goods, software, or any other product or information necessary to conduct sports betting or determine the outcome of wagers; new text end new text begin (13) the requirements for employees of mobile sports betting operators whose exclusive or primary responsibilities involve mobile sports betting, including minimum age requirements, criminal background checks, and retention of documents related to the employees; new text end new text begin (14) the appropriate limits, requirements, standards, and regulations, if any, related to marketing and advertising, developed in consultation with the state affiliate recognized by the National Council on Problem Gambling, including rules to address the time, place, and manner of marketing and advertising, the types of wagers that may be marketed or advertised, and the types of mobile sports betting accounts that may be marketed or advertised; new text end new text begin (15) the limits and requirements related to advertising, including: new text end new text begin (i) rules that prohibit depicting an individual under age 21 engaging in sports betting; new text end new text begin (ii) rules that prohibit advertisement in any print or digital publication or on the radio, television, or any other medium if more than ten percent of the targeted audience of that medium is reasonably expected to be individuals who are under age 21 or that violate any statutory provisions related to advertising restrictions; and new text end new text begin (iii) rules that establish what warnings and other information an advertisement must contain; new text end new text begin (16) the requirements for monitoring patterns of wagering to identify behaviors consistent with problem gambling and the appropriate actions to take when problem gambling is suspected, including pausing or suspending activities from an identified mobile sports betting account; and new text end new text begin (17) the appropriate limits, standards, and requirements necessary to prevent excessive wagering by an individual whose ability to control impulsive wagering is impaired in any way. new text end new text begin (b) Rules for which notice is published in the State Register before January 1, 2026, may be adopted using the expedited rulemaking process in section 14.389. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner shall regularly review and update rules designed to prevent and address gambling disorders to incorporate advances in the understanding of gambling disorders and updated best practices in the area. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Delegation. new text end new text begin The commissioner may delegate any of its authority under this chapter to the director if, in the judgment of the commissioner, doing so would promote the efficient administration of this chapter. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Requests for restrictions on wager types. new text end new text begin (a) A sports governing body may request that the commissioner prohibit or restrict wagers on a particular sporting event, or prohibit or restrict particular types of wagers if the sports governing body believes that such type, form, or category of sports betting may undermine the integrity or perceived integrity of the sports governing body or sporting event. new text end new text begin (b) Requests from a sports governing body shall be made in the form and manner established by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (c) Upon receipt of a request made under this subdivision, the commissioner shall send written notice to every mobile sports betting operator, provide mobile sports betting operators with an opportunity to respond to the request, and consider any timely response submitted by a mobile sports betting operator. The commissioner may not take action without providing mobile sports betting operators with an opportunity to respond, but may establish reasonable deadlines for the response based on the nature of the request and any exigent circumstances that exist. new text end new text begin (d) If the commissioner determines that the sports governing body has shown good cause to support the requested prohibition or restriction, the commissioner shall adopt the prohibition or restriction and send notice of the prohibition or restriction to every mobile sports betting operator. If the commissioner determines that the sports governing body has not shown good cause to support the requested prohibition or restriction, the commissioner shall provide the sports governing body with notice and an opportunity for a hearing to offer further evidence in support of its request. The commissioner shall provide the mobile sports betting operators with notice of the hearing and an opportunity to participate. new text end new text begin (e) The commissioner shall respond to a request concerning a particular event before the start of the event, or if it is not feasible to respond before the start of the event, no later than seven days after the request is made. new text end new text begin (f) If the commissioner determines that the requestor is more likely than not to prevail in successfully demonstrating good cause for its request, the commissioner may provisionally grant the request of the sports governing body until the commissioner makes a final determination as to whether the requestor has demonstrated good cause. Absent such a provisional grant, mobile sports betting operators may continue to offer sports betting on covered sporting events that are the subject of the request during the pendency of the commissioner's consideration of the applicable request. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Helpline. new text end new text begin The commissioner must provide a helpline, accessible by telephone or online live chat, that operates 24 hours per day and seven days per week, staffed by people trained in the psychology of gambling disorders and suicide prevention to assist those who contact the helpline to help the person with a gambling disorder. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Methods for identifying people at risk for gambling disorders. new text end new text begin The commissioner must monitor the sports betting industry for the most effective methods to identify people with a gambling disorder. The commissioner must adopt rules to implement best practices to prevent sports betting by people flagged as having a gambling disorder or being at risk of developing a gambling disorder. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Exclusion audits. new text end new text begin The commissioner must periodically conduct audits as to the compliance of platform providers and operators with preclusions on sports betting in section 299L.45. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Mobile sports betting start date. new text end new text begin No person shall offer mobile sports betting in this state before the start date. All applicants for a mobile sports betting operator or mobile sports betting platform provider license that have submitted an application within 30 days of the date on which the commissioner begins to accept mobile sports betting operator or mobile sports betting platform provider license applications shall be given an equal opportunity to first commence offering, conducting, and operating mobile sports betting in this state on the same day. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin [299L.20] LICENSE TYPES; TRANSFERS PROHIBITED. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner shall issue the following licenses for mobile sports betting: new text end new text begin (1) up to 11 mobile sports betting operator licenses; new text end new text begin (2) up to 11 mobile sports betting platform provider licenses; and new text end new text begin (3) sports betting supplier licenses. new text end new text begin (b) Licenses issued under sections 299L.10 to 299L.80 may not be transferred. Notwithstanding the foregoing, platform provider licenses may be transferred with the commissioner's approval. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin [299L.25] GENERAL LICENSING REQUIREMENTS; DISQUALIFICATIONS; BACKGROUND INVESTIGATIONS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin General requirements. new text end new text begin (a) A licensee or applicant must meet each of the following requirements, if applicable, to hold or receive a license issued under sections 299L.10 to 299L.80: new text end new text begin (1) have completed an application for licensure or application for renewal; new text end new text begin (2) have paid the applicable application and licensing fees; new text end new text begin (3) not be employed by any state agency with regulatory authority over mobile sports betting; new text end new text begin (4) not owe $500 or more in delinquent taxes, as defined in section 270C.72; new text end new text begin (5) not have had a sales and use tax permit revoked by the commissioner of revenue within the past two years; and new text end new text begin (6) not have, after demand, failed to file tax returns required by the commissioner of revenue. new text end new text begin (b) The requirements under paragraph (a) apply to the applicant or licensee, or a director, officer, partner, member of the governing body for the applicant or licensee, whose exclusive or primary responsibility is to conduct mobile sports betting operations in this state. new text end new text begin (c) The requirements under paragraph (a) do not apply to an elected or appointed representative of any applicant or licensee that is an Indian Tribe unless the representative is also a full-time employee of the applicant's or licensee's mobile sports betting operations. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Criminal offenses; disqualifications. new text end new text begin (a) No person may hold or receive a license issued under sections 299L.10 to 299L.80 if the person has been convicted of, or received a stay of adjudication for, a violation of a state or federal law that: new text end new text begin (1) is a felony, other than any act that would be a violation of section 152.025 under Minnesota law; new text end new text begin (2) is a crime involving gambling; or new text end new text begin (3) is a crime involving theft or fraud that would be a gross misdemeanor or felony under Minnesota law. new text end new text begin (b) The requirements under paragraph (a) apply to the applicant or licensee, or a director, officer, partner, member of the governing body for the applicant or licensee, person in a supervisory or management position of the applicant or licensee, or any direct or indirect holder of more than ten percent financial interest in the applicant or licensee. new text end new text begin (c) The requirements under paragraph (a) do not apply to an elected or appointed representative of any applicant or licensee that is an Indian Tribe unless the representative is also a full-time employee of the applicant's or licensee's mobile sports betting operations. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Background investigation. new text end new text begin The commissioner must perform a background investigation on applicants for a license or license renewal and on each director, officer, partner, member of the governing body for the applicant or licensee, person in a supervisory or management position of the applicant or licensee, or any direct or indirect holder of more than ten percent financial interest in the applicant or licensee. The commissioner may request the director and the commissioner of revenue to assist in investigating the background of an applicant or a licensee under this section. The commissioner may charge an applicant an investigation fee to cover the cost of the investigation and shall from this fee reimburse the Division of Alcohol and Gambling Enforcement and the Department of Revenue for their respective shares of the cost of the investigation. The commissioner is authorized to have access to all data compiled by the Division of Alcohol and Gambling Enforcement on licensees and applicants. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Criminal history record check. new text end new text begin The commissioner must perform a criminal history record check on each officer, director, or stakeholder with more than ten percent interest in the licensee or applicant. The records check must include a criminal history check of the state and federal criminal records. The applicant or licensee must provide signed consent for the national criminal history records check and fingerprints for each person subject to a check under this subdivision, except that an individual who has submitted to a national criminal history records check in this or any other state within the previous 12 months shall not be required to submit to another national criminal history records check provided that the person submits the results of such previous national criminal history records check. The director shall assist in performing the criminal history records check. The director may charge an applicant a fee to cover the cost of the criminal history record check, and shall from this fee reimburse the Division of Alcohol and Gambling Enforcement for its share of the cost of the investigation. The commissioner or the director must submit the signed informed consent, fingerprints, and Bureau of Criminal Apprehension and Federal Bureau of Investigation fees to the superintendent of the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension who is authorized to exchange the fingerprints with the Federal Bureau of Investigation to obtain the applicant's national criminal history data. The superintendent of the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension shall retrieve Minnesota criminal history data and shall provide the results of the state and federal criminal history record check to the director. The commissioner is authorized to have access to all criminal history data compiled on licensees and applicants by the Division of Alcohol and Gambling Enforcement, including criminal history data on each officer, director, or stakeholder with more than ten percent interest in the licensee or applicant. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Prohibition on use of information. new text end new text begin The provisions of this section only apply to mobile sports betting operations and do not apply to other activities relating to Tribal gaming operations, Tribal government records, or class III sports betting operations conducted exclusively on Indian lands. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Applicability. new text end new text begin The requirements under this section do not apply to an elected or appointed representative of any applicant or licensee that is an Indian Tribe unless the representative is also a full-time employee of the applicant's or licensee's mobile sports betting operations. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin [299L.26] LICENSE APPLICATION AND RENEWAL; GENERAL REQUIREMENTS; PROCEDURE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Application; contents. new text end new text begin An application for a license under sections 299L.10 to 299L.80 must be submitted on a form prescribed by the commissioner. At a minimum, the application must include: new text end new text begin (1) the name and address of the applicant and, if it is a corporation, the names of all officers, directors, and shareholders with more than ten percent interest in the corporation and any of its holding companies; new text end new text begin (2) the type of license being sought; new text end new text begin (3) if required by the commissioner, the names of any person holding directly, indirectly, or beneficially an interest of any kind in the applicant or any of its holding corporations, whether the interest is financial, administrative, policy making, or supervisory. This provision does not extend to individual Tribal members whose only relation to the applicant is their membership in their respective Tribal Nations, or to an elected or appointed representative of any applicant or licensee that is an Indian Tribe unless the representative is also a full-time employee of the applicant's or licensee's mobile sports betting operations; new text end new text begin (4) an affidavit executed by the applicant setting forth that, to the best of the applicant's knowledge, no officer, director, or other person with a present direct or indirect financial or management interest in the applicant: new text end new text begin (i) is in default in the payment of an obligation or debt to the state; new text end new text begin (ii) has ever been convicted of a crime listed in section 299L.25, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), or has a state or federal charge for one of those crimes pending; new text end new text begin (iii) is or has been convicted of engaging in an illegal business; new text end new text begin (iv) has ever been found guilty of fraud or misrepresentation in connection with wagering; or new text end new text begin (v) has ever knowingly violated a rule or order of the commissioner or a law of Minnesota relating to wagering; new text end new text begin (5) an irrevocable consent statement, signed by the applicant, which states that suits and actions limited to the enforcement of this chapter may be commenced against the applicant by the commissioner in any court of competent jurisdiction in this state by the service on the secretary of state of any summons, process, or pleadings authorized by the laws of this state. If any summons, process, or pleadings is served upon the secretary of state, it must be by duplicate copies. One copy must be retained in the Office of the Secretary of State and the other copy must be forwarded immediately by certified mail to the address of the applicant, as shown by the records of the commissioner; new text end new text begin (6) a declaration that the laws of the state of Minnesota will be followed, including any applicable provisions of the Minnesota Human Rights Act, chapter 363A; and new text end new text begin (7) any additional information required for the specific license the applicant is seeking. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Application; process. new text end new text begin (a) Applicants must submit all required information to the commissioner on the forms and in the manner prescribed by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (b) If the commissioner receives an application that fails to provide the required information, the commissioner shall issue a deficiency notice to the applicant. The applicant shall have ten business days from the date of the deficiency notice to submit the required information. new text end new text begin (c) Failure by an applicant to submit all required information will result in the application being rejected. new text end new text begin (d) Within 90 days of receiving a completed application for an applicant not subject to the selection process in section 299L.78, the commissioner shall issue the appropriate license or send the applicant a notice of rejection setting forth specific reasons why the commissioner did not approve the application. For an applicant subject to the selection process in section 299L.78, the commissioner must issue the appropriate license promptly after selection. new text end new text begin (e) An applicant whose application is not approved may reapply at any time, but must submit a new application and pay an additional application fee. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin [299L.27] DUTY TO UPDATE. new text end new text begin (a) During the pendency of an application and at any time after a license has been issued, an applicant or licensee shall notify the commissioner of any changes to the information provided under section 299L.25 or 299L.26. new text end new text begin (b) If a change in the officers, directors, shareholders, or other persons with a present or future direct or indirect financial or management interest in a licensee, or a change of ownership of more than ten percent of the shares of the licensee is made after the application for a license is filed or a license is issued, the applicant or licensee must notify the commissioner of the changes within ten business days of their occurrence and submit a new affidavit as required by section 299L.26, subdivision 1, clause 4. new text end Sec. 9. new text begin [299L.28] MOBILE SPORTS BETTING OPERATOR LICENSE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Issuance. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner may issue up to 11 mobile sports betting operator licenses that are valid for 20 years. A mobile sports betting operator license may be renewed under conditions required by rule adopted pursuant to section 299L.15. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner shall only issue a mobile sports betting operator license to an Indian Tribe that lawfully conducts class III gaming in a casino located in this state under a facility license issued in accordance with a Tribal gaming ordinance approved by the chair of the National Indian Gaming Commission. new text end new text begin (c) Each Indian Tribe described in paragraph (b) is not eligible for more than one mobile sports betting operator license. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Authorized actions. new text end new text begin A mobile sports betting operator license entitles the licensee to: new text end new text begin (1) operate, coordinate, conduct, or offer for play mobile sports betting in Minnesota; new text end new text begin (2) contract with one licensed mobile sports betting platform provider to facilitate the acceptance of wagers on behalf of the mobile sports betting operator; new text end new text begin (3) contract with licensed sports betting suppliers; and new text end new text begin (4) perform any other actions approved by the commissioner to ensure that mobile sports betting is conducted in a fair, lawful, and transparent manner. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Licensing requirements. new text end new text begin A mobile sports betting operator must: new text end new text begin (1) be an entity wholly owned and controlled by an Indian Tribe; new text end new text begin (2) submit a completed application and all required documents or other materials pursuant to sections 299L.25 and 299L.26 and any relevant rules; new text end new text begin (3) submit a detailed plan and specifications for the implementation of mobile sports betting; new text end new text begin (4) include commercially reasonable and practicable mechanisms on its mobile sports betting platform that are designed to detect and prevent the unauthorized use of Internet sports betting accounts and to detect and prevent fraud, money laundering, and collusion, or require a contracted mobile sports betting platform provider to include those commercially reasonable and practicable mechanisms; new text end new text begin (5) submit a statement of the assets and liabilities of the license holder to the commissioner; new text end new text begin (6) not be disqualified under section 299L.25 or any relevant rules; new text end new text begin (7) pay an annual licensing fee in the amount of $2,125; and new text end new text begin (8) meet any other conditions required by rule adopted pursuant to section 299L.15. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Reporting. new text end new text begin A mobile sports betting operator must report to the commissioner monthly on wagers placed and redeemed during the reporting month and outstanding at the time of the report. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Prohibition on use of information. new text end new text begin The provisions of this section only apply to mobile sports betting operations in this state and do not apply to other activities relating to Tribal gaming operations, Tribal government records, or class III sports betting operations conducted exclusively on Indian lands. new text end Sec. 10. new text begin [299L.29] MOBILE SPORTS BETTING PLATFORM PROVIDER LICENSE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Issuance. new text end new text begin The commissioner may issue up to 11 mobile sports betting platform provider licenses that are valid for three years. A mobile sports betting platform provider may be renewed under conditions required by rule adopted pursuant to section 299L.15. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Authorized actions. new text end new text begin A mobile sports betting platform provider license entitles the licensee to provide a sports betting platform, sports betting technology, sports betting applications, or associated mobile sports betting hardware, software, or equipment to a mobile sports betting operator. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Licensing requirements. new text end new text begin A mobile sports betting platform provider must: new text end new text begin (1) submit a completed application and all required documents or other materials pursuant to sections 299L.25 and 299L.26 and any relevant rules; new text end new text begin (2) not be disqualified under section 299L.25 or any relevant rules; new text end new text begin (3) pay an application fee of $6,000 with submission of an application; new text end new text begin (4) pay a licensing fee after the application is approved in the amount of $38,250 or a license renewal fee of $25,500; and new text end new text begin (5) meet any other conditions required by rule adopted pursuant to section 299L.15. new text end Sec. 11. new text begin [299L.30] SPORTS BETTING SUPPLIER LICENSE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Issuance. new text end new text begin The commissioner may issue sports betting supplier licenses that are valid for three years. A sports betting supplier license may be renewed under conditions required by rule adopted pursuant to section 299L.15. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Authorized actions. new text end new text begin A sports betting supplier license entitles the licensee to directly provide mobile sports betting operators with information and support necessary to offer mobile sports betting. Information and support may be provided in the form of services, goods, or software, and may include data feeds and odds services, risk management, and integrity monitoring. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Licensing requirements. new text end new text begin (a) A mobile sports betting supplier must: new text end new text begin (1) submit a completed application and all required documents for the applicant's principal owners who directly own ten percent or more of the applicant and the applicant's officers; new text end new text begin (2) pay an application fee of $6,000 with submission of an application; new text end new text begin (3) pay a licensing fee after the application is approved in the amount of $38,250 or a license renewal fee of $25,500; and new text end new text begin (4) meet any other conditions required by rule adopted pursuant to section 299L.15. new text end new text begin (b) Provided an application has been completed to the satisfaction of the commissioner, disclosure of the following public information may be waived: new text end new text begin (1) statutorily authorized pension investment boards that are direct or indirect shareholders of an applicant; and new text end new text begin (2) investment funds or entities registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission, including any investment advisors or entities under the management of an entity registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission, that are direct or indirect shareholders of the applicant. new text end Sec. 12. new text begin [299L.35] PARTNERSHIP ALLOWED. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Ability to contract with platform providers. new text end new text begin (a) A mobile sports betting operator may, but is not required to, contract with a mobile sports betting platform provider to provide, create, or operate sports betting platforms, sports betting technology, sports betting applications, or associated mobile sports betting hardware, software, or equipment. new text end new text begin (b) If a mobile sports betting operator chooses to contract with a mobile sports betting platform provider for these services, the mobile sports betting operator shall contract with no more than one mobile sports betting platform provider. new text end new text begin (c) If a mobile sports betting operator chooses not to contract with a mobile sports betting platform provider for these services, then the mobile sports betting operator must comply with the reporting and regulatory requirements held by mobile sports betting platform provider license holders. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Logo display required. new text end new text begin A mobile sports betting platform provider that has contracted with a mobile sports betting operator must clearly display a brand of the mobile sports betting operator within its mobile application in addition to any other brand that the mobile sports betting platform provider uses to conduct, offer, or play mobile sports betting in Minnesota. new text end Sec. 13. new text begin [299L.36] DEPOSIT OF FEES. new text end new text begin Application, license, and renewal fees shall be deposited in the sports betting revenue account in the special revenue fund. new text end Sec. 14. new text begin [299L.37] ADVERTISING. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Prohibition on targeting individuals under age 21. new text end new text begin (a) No licensee or other person shall publish or cause to be published an advertisement for mobile sports betting that: new text end new text begin (1) depicts a person under age 21 engaging in sports betting or mobile sports betting; new text end new text begin (2) includes an image that is designed to be appealing to individuals under age 21 or encourage sports betting by individuals under age 21; or new text end new text begin (3) is in any print or digital publication or on the radio, television, or any other medium if ten percent or more of the audience of that medium is reasonably expected to be individuals who are under age 21, as determined by reliable, current audience composition data. new text end new text begin (b) Each licensee must report annually by February 1 to the commissioner with details on the licensee's advertising placements for the previous calendar year. The report must specify where each ad was placed, the estimated audience age demographics for that ad placement, and any other metrics that the licensee monitors to ensure and to prove compliance with this subdivision. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Prohibition on targeting individuals prohibited from placing wagers. new text end new text begin No licensee or other person shall publish or cause to be published an advertisement for mobile sports betting that targets individuals who are disqualified, prohibited, or excluded from placing a wager on a sporting event for any reason, including being identified on the exclusion list identified in section 299L.45, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Advertising on public property. new text end new text begin No licensee or other person may publish or cause to be published, displayed, disseminated, or distributed, an advertisement for or marketing material for sports betting, or take actions to promote or market sports betting, on public property or within 500 feet of a school or playground. For purposes of this section, "public property" means property owned by the state or a home rule charter or statutory city, county, town, school district, metropolitan or regional agency, public corporation, political subdivision, or special district, as defined in section 6.465. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Advertising content. new text end new text begin (a) All advertisements for mobile sports betting must display the National Council on Problem Gambling's helpline number or other national toll-free numbers approved by the commissioner for information and referral services for gambling disorders and must provide a warning, as specified by the commissioner, that gambling may be addictive and may cause financial hardship. new text end new text begin (b) Any advertisement for mobile sports betting referencing a promotion shall: new text end new text begin (1) disclose applicable terms if the authorized participant must risk or lose the authorized participant's own funds as part of the promotion or if such promotion has conditions that an authorized participant's own funds must be used to qualify for such promotion; new text end new text begin (2) not be described as "risk-free" if the authorized participant needs to incur any loss or risk the authorized participant's own money to use or withdraw winnings from the risk-free bet; and new text end new text begin (3) not restrict the authorized participant from withdrawing the authorized participant's own funds or withdraw winnings from bets placed using the authorized participant's own funds. new text end new text begin (c) Partnerships between mobile sports betting operators or mobile sports betting platform providers and colleges or universities shall not include any component that advertises, markets, or promotes sports betting activity unless such partnerships are exclusively with alumni networks or are content that is exclusively focused on responsible gambling education or problem gambling awareness. new text end new text begin (d) Mobile sports betting operators or mobile sports betting platform providers shall not enter name, image, and likeness endorsements or partnerships with amateur athletes in the state. new text end new text begin (e) No advertising, marketing, in-app advertisements, emails, or other promotional materials published, aired, displayed, disseminated, or distributed by or on behalf of a mobile sports betting operator or mobile sports betting platform provider for sports betting shall be published, aired, displayed, disseminated, or distributed: new text end new text begin (1) on any college or university campus property; or new text end new text begin (2) in college- or university-owned news assets. new text end new text begin (f) Nothing in this act shall apply to any advertisements for commercial retail products or services other than mobile sports betting. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Prohibition on false or misleading claims. new text end new text begin No licensee or other person shall publish or cause to be published an advertisement for mobile sports betting that contains false or misleading claims or which contains statements, words, or pictures of an obscene, indecent, or immoral character, or such as would offend public morals or decency. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Prohibition on certain terminology in advertising. new text end new text begin No licensee or other person may publish or cause to be published an advertisement or marketing or promotional material that makes an offer for a person to place a bet without risk of loss, if the person must risk the player's own money to take advantage of the offer or promotion. This includes advertisements or marketing or promotional materials using the phrase "risk-free," "free play," or other similar terminology. new text end Sec. 15. new text begin [299L.40] WAGERING. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Placing wagers. new text end new text begin An individual who is 21 years of age or older may place wagers pursuant to sections 299L.10 to 299L.80 provided the individual is not otherwise disqualified, prohibited, or excluded from doing so. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Wager type. new text end new text begin A mobile sports betting operator, or a mobile sports betting platform provider on behalf of a mobile sports betting operator, may only accept wagers of a type previously approved by the commissioner. Wager types that the commissioner may approve include but are not limited to the following: new text end new text begin (1) a wager that a participant or participating team will win a sporting event or will win by a specified number of points; new text end new text begin (2) a wager as to whether the total points scored in a sporting event will be higher or lower than a number specified; new text end new text begin (3) a wager on an outcome contingency or proposition incidental to a sporting event, series, tournament, or season for which the outcome is published in newspapers of general circulation or in records made publicly available by the league or governing body for the event; new text end new text begin (4) a wager on the outcome of a series of two or more sporting events or a series of two or more contingencies incidental to a sporting event; new text end new text begin (5) future bets placed on end of the season standings, awards, or statistics; and new text end new text begin (6) a wager that a participant or participating team will win an esports event or will win by a specified number of points. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Wager types prohibited. new text end new text begin Mobile sports betting operators, or a mobile sports betting platform provider on behalf of a mobile sports betting operator, shall not offer or accept wagers on the occurrence or outcomes of the following situations that may occur during or after a sporting event: new text end new text begin (1) player injuries; new text end new text begin (2) penalties; new text end new text begin (3) the outcome of player disciplinary rulings; new text end new text begin (4) replay reviews; or new text end new text begin (5) in-game betting. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Mobile sports betting account; establishment. new text end new text begin (a) An individual may establish a mobile sports betting account by electronic means from any location, and may fund an account by any means approved by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (b) A mobile sports betting account must provide a mechanism for an individual to set limits on the amount of time they spend on the mobile sports betting platform, set limits on the amount of money they spend on the platform, and self-exclude from using the mobile sports betting platform. A mobile sports betting account provider must allow a person to set the following limits for the person's mobile sports betting account: new text end new text begin (1) a limit on the amount that can be deposited within a specified period; new text end new text begin (2) a limit on losses within a specified period; and new text end new text begin (3) a limit on the time spent placing bets. new text end new text begin The mobile sports betting account must not allow the account to be used to place bets when the person has met a limit the person has set. The mobile sports betting account provider must provide notice to the person of the opportunity to set these limits at the time the person sets up the account and annually after setup and must require a person to either set limits or affirm that the person does not want to set any limits at account setup and annually after setup. The notice must be worded and formatted as specified by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (c) Information provided by an individual who establishes a mobile sports betting account may be accessed, stored, and used by a mobile sports betting operator. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Consideration; mobile sports betting account. new text end new text begin (a) A mobile sports betting operator or mobile sports betting platform provider must not accept a wager unless the authorized participant provides consideration in the form of funds or other thing of value such as use of free bets or promotional credits from their mobile sports betting account at the time of making the wager. new text end new text begin (b) Consideration must be in the form of withdrawal from a mobile sports betting account maintained by the mobile sports betting operator or mobile sports betting platform provider for the benefit of and in the name of the wagerer. new text end new text begin (c) A mobile sports betting operator, or a mobile sports betting platform provider on behalf of a mobile sports betting operator, shall verify an individual's age and identity before allowing that individual to establish a mobile sports betting account. Mobile sports betting operators and mobile sports betting platform providers must utilize an approved identity verification service provider to confirm an individual's age and identity. new text end new text begin (d) A person shall have the right to withdraw the balance of funds in the mobile sports betting account in the person's name at any time with proof of identity, as determined by rules adopted pursuant to section 299L.15. The balance of funds in the account includes money the person has deposited into the account and the value of all promotional credits available to the person to apply toward betting, including refunds for losses that are credited to the account as a promotion. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Wager location. new text end new text begin (a) Mobile sports betting wagers regulated under sections 299L.10 to 299L.80 may only be accepted from a person placing a wager online, through a website or mobile application, while the person placing the wager is physically within the state and not within an area geofenced under paragraph (b). The website or application may be hosted by a mobile sports betting operator operating in conjunction with a mobile sports betting platform provider. The incidental routing of a mobile sports wager shall not determine the location or locations in which the wager is initiated, received, or otherwise made. new text end new text begin (b) Wagering is prohibited within ... yards of elementary or secondary school buildings or higher education institutions. Mobile sports betting platform providers must incorporate geofencing to make sports betting from a mobile application unavailable in these areas. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Information provided at the time of wager. new text end new text begin A mobile sports betting operator or mobile sports betting platform provider must disclose the betting line and terms of a wager prior to accepting a wager. Terms of the wager include the ratio of the amount to be paid for winning to the wagered amount. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Outcome determined. new text end new text begin A mobile sports betting operator or mobile sports betting platform provider must not accept a wager on the outcome of an event or proposition that has already been determined. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Receipt. new text end new text begin A mobile sports betting operator or mobile sports betting platform provider must provide a person who places a wager with an electronic receipt at the time of sale that contains the following information: new text end new text begin (1) the sporting event or proposition that is the subject of the wager; new text end new text begin (2) the outcome that will constitute a win on the wager; new text end new text begin (3) the amount wagered; and new text end new text begin (4) the payout in the event of a winning wager. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Wager data; safeguards necessary. new text end new text begin (a) Information regarding wagers made by an authorized participant who engages in mobile sports betting, including but not limited to wager type and consideration paid, may be accessed, stored, or used for ordinary business purposes by the mobile sports betting operator. new text end new text begin (b) Mobile sports betting operators and mobile sports betting platform providers must use commercially reasonable methods to maintain the security of wager data, authorized participant data, and other confidential information from unauthorized access and dissemination, however, that nothing in this act shall preclude the use of Internet or cloud-based hosting of such data and information or disclosure as required by court order, other law, or this act. new text end Sec. 16. new text begin [299L.41] PUSH NOTIFICATIONS. new text end new text begin (a) Mobile sports betting operators and mobile sports betting platform providers are prohibited from sending a message from a mobile sports betting application or website that appears on a user's device while the application or website is inactive unless the message is sent to notify the user of potentially fraudulent activity associated with the user's mobile sports betting account. new text end new text begin (b) Mobile sports betting operators and mobile sports betting platform providers are prohibited from sending a message that advertises or promotes sports betting from a mobile sports betting application or website to appear on a user's device while the user is setting or exploring self-imposed restrictions under section 299L.45. new text end Sec. 17. new text begin [299L.45] EXCLUSION LIST, PROHIBITION ON WAGERING, AND RED FLAG WARNINGS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Exclusion list. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner shall maintain a list of persons who are not eligible to wager on sporting events through a mobile sports betting operator. The list shall include the names of: new text end new text begin (1) persons who have themselves requested to be on the exclusion list; new text end new text begin (2) persons whose names have been submitted, for their protection, by their legal guardians; new text end new text begin (3) persons whose names have been submitted by mobile sports betting operators, mobile sports betting platform providers, or mobile sports betting suppliers for good cause; and new text end new text begin (4) persons whose names have been submitted by sports governing bodies. new text end new text begin (b) A person who has requested to be on the exclusion list may specify a time limit of one or five years or for the person's lifetime for the person's name to be on the list. The commissioner will remove the person's name from the list at the conclusion of the specified time. new text end new text begin (c) The information contained on the list is private data on individuals, as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 12, except the commissioner shall transmit the list with mobile sports betting operators and mobile sports betting platform providers to prevent persons on the exclusion list from placing sports betting wagers. new text end new text begin (d) A mobile platform provider must provide a user the opportunity to request to be on the exclusion list for a specified time of one or five years or for the person's lifetime. The platform provider must report the request to the commissioner and the commissioner must immediately add the person's name and exclusion request to the list maintained under this section. new text end new text begin (e) The commissioner must provide through the agency's website a form for a person to make a request to be included on the exclusion list for a specified time of one or five years or for the person's lifetime. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Prohibited wagers by certain persons. new text end new text begin The following individuals who are otherwise authorized to place wagers are prohibited from placing the wagers described: new text end new text begin (1) an individual who is prohibited from placing wagers by a mobile sports betting operator or mobile sports betting platform provider for good cause, including, but not limited to, any individual placing a wager as an agent or proxy on behalf of another may not place a wager of any kind; new text end new text begin (2) an individual who is an athlete, coach, referee, player, trainer, or team employee is prohibited from wagering on a sporting event overseen by that person's sports governing body; new text end new text begin (3) an individual who holds a position of authority sufficient to exert influence over the participants in a sporting event, including, but not limited to, a coach, manager, or owner is prohibited from wagering on that sporting event; new text end new text begin (4) an individual who has access to certain types of exclusive or nonpublic information regarding a sporting event is prohibited from wagering on that sporting event and any other sporting event overseen by the sports governing body of that sporting event; and new text end new text begin (5) for purposes of this subdivision, "owner" of a team shall mean an individual who owns more than five percent of the team. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Personal limits on wagering. new text end new text begin (a) A mobile sports betting operator or mobile sports betting platform provider must allow individuals to establish the following types of limits on their own wagering activity: new text end new text begin (1) a limit on the amount the person can lose in a 24-hour period before triggering a cooling-off period; new text end new text begin (2) a limit on the amount a person can lose in a 30-day period before triggering a cooling-off period; new text end new text begin (3) the maximum amount a person may deposit into the person's mobile sports betting account in a 24-hour period; new text end new text begin (4) the maximum amount of time a person can be logged into their mobile sports betting program in a 24-hour period; and new text end new text begin (5) a cooling-off period during which time the person is not able to place wagers. new text end new text begin (b) A mobile sports betting operator or mobile sports betting platform provider must set the limits in paragraph (a) to the following default limits for a new account, subject to any limits established by law: new text end new text begin (1) $500 is the default amount of losses a person can incur in a 24-hour period before the person is prohibited from wagering; new text end new text begin (2) $3,000 is the default limit on the amount a person can lose in a 30-day period before the person is prohibited from wagering; new text end new text begin (3) $500 is the default maximum amount a person may deposit into the person's mobile sports betting account in a 24-hour period; new text end new text begin (4) four hours per 24-hour period is the default limit on the time that a person may be continuously logged into a mobile sports betting application; and new text end new text begin (5) 72 hours is the default length of a cooling-off period if a person requests a cooling-off period during which time wagers from the person cannot be accepted. new text end new text begin (c) A mobile sports betting operator or mobile sports betting platform provider must not accept a wager from a person in a cooling-off period or in an exclusion period set by a person in paragraph (a) or, if the person does not set exclusion periods under paragraph (a), during the default exclusion periods established in paragraph (b). new text end new text begin (d) A mobile sports betting operator must allow a person to make changes to their exclusion settings under paragraph (a) in ways that make them more restrictive at any time and those limits must take effect immediately. Changes that make the exclusion settings under paragraph (a) less restrictive become effective 7 days after the person makes the change. new text end new text begin (e) A mobile sports betting operator must require a person to review the limits in paragraph (a) annually. new text end new text begin (f) A mobile sports betting operator must report to the commissioner when a person becomes excluded due to hitting a limit set under paragraph (a) or (b). The commissioner must communicate to other licensed mobile sports betting operators or platform providers as necessary to make the exclusion effective across all opportunities for participating in sports betting in Minnesota. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Prohibition on accepting wagers. new text end new text begin (a) A mobile sports betting operator or mobile sports betting platform provider shall not knowingly accept a wager from a person on the exclusion list or allow a person on the exclusion list to establish a mobile sports betting account. new text end new text begin (b) A mobile sports betting operator or a mobile sports betting platform provider shall not knowingly accept a wager prohibited under subdivision 2 from any individual who can reasonably be identified by publicly available information or by any lists provided to the commissioner. new text end new text begin (c) Knowingly accepting a wager from a person on the exclusion list is a license violation, subject to a penalty established by the commissioner. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Notice. new text end new text begin The commissioner shall notify a person whose name has been added to the exclusion list under subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (2), (3), or (4). new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Prohibition on advertising. new text end new text begin A platform provider and operator are prohibited from contacting a person through communications in a mobile sports betting application, email, text, or telephone call, for the purpose of advertising or promoting sports betting during the following periods: new text end new text begin (1) during a period of betting restrictions under this section; and new text end new text begin (2) after the period of betting restrictions under this section is over, until the person places a bet through the platform or with the operator. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Red flag warnings. new text end new text begin (a) A person may report to the commissioner concerns about another person's problematic sports wagering, if the reporting person is a family member of the wagerer. new text end new text begin (b) For purposes of this subdivision, a "family member" is a person who is: new text end new text begin (1) a spouse; new text end new text begin (2) a minor child, stepchild, foster child, sibling, stepsibling, parent, or stepparent; or new text end new text begin (3) a person who shares responsibility with the wagerer to pay a mortgage for a homestead or shares an obligation to pay rent, or who shares a home with the wagerer. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner must take reasonable steps to confirm that the reporting person is a family member of the wagerer. new text end new text begin (d) With the approval of the reporting family member, the commissioner must communicate to licensees that a wagerer has been flagged under this section. new text end new text begin (e) Neither the commissioner nor the licensee may communicate to the wagerer that a warning has been made under this subdivision. new text end Sec. 18. new text begin [299L.50] FINANCIAL RESPONSIBILITY. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Responsibility for satisfying winning wagers. new text end new text begin A wager on a sporting event placed with a mobile sports betting operator or mobile sports betting platform provider is an enforceable contract. A mobile sports betting operator or mobile sports betting platform provider who accepts a wager bears all risk of loss to satisfy winnings on the wager. A wager that is not redeemed within one year of the outcome that is the subject of the wager may be canceled by the mobile sports betting operator or the mobile sports betting platform provider. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Reserve requirements. new text end new text begin (a) A mobile sports betting operator shall, in conjunction with the mobile sports betting platform provider, maintain reserves in an amount that is not less than the greater of $25,000 or the sum of the following three amounts: new text end new text begin (1) amounts held by the mobile sports betting operator for the mobile sports betting accounts of authorized participants; new text end new text begin (2) amounts accepted by the mobile sports betting operator as wagers on contingencies whose outcome have not been determined; and new text end new text begin (3) amounts owed but unpaid by the mobile sports betting operator on winning wagers through the period established by the operator, subject to time limits set by the commissioner, for honoring winning wagers. new text end new text begin (b) Such reserves shall be held in the form of cash or cash equivalents segregated from operational funds, payment processor reserves and receivables, any bond, an irrevocable letter of credit, or any combination thereof. new text end new text begin (c) In lieu of holding cash reserves outlined in subdivision 2, paragraphs (a) and (b), a mobile sports betting operator or mobile sports betting platform provider may post a bond, securities, or an irrevocable letter of credit in an amount the commissioner deems necessary after taking into consideration the amount of the mobile sports betting operator's cash reserves, to protect the financial interests of people wagering on sporting events. If securities are deposited or an irrevocable letter of credit filed, the securities or letter of credit must be of a type or in the form provided under section 349A.07, subdivision 5, paragraphs (b) and (c). new text end Sec. 19. new text begin [299L.51] INTEGRITY MONITORING. new text end new text begin (a) Each mobile sports betting operator or mobile sports betting platform provider must contract with a licensed independent integrity monitoring provider in order to identify any unusual betting activity or patterns that may indicate a need for further investigation. The commissioner shall establish minimum standards requiring each mobile sports betting operator or mobile sports betting platform provider to participate in the monitoring system as part of that licensee's minimum internal control standards. new text end new text begin (b) If any unusual betting activity is deemed by independent integrity monitoring provider to have risen to the level of suspicious betting activity, then the independent integrity monitoring provider shall immediately report the suspicious activity to the commissioner, all mobile sports betting operator or mobile sports betting platform provider licensees that contract with that integrity provider, and the sports governing body that governs the sporting event on which the suspicious activity was deemed to have taken place. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner, mobile sports betting operators, and any sports governing body that receives the information described in paragraph (b) from an independent integrity monitoring provider must maintain the confidentiality of the information, and use the information solely for purposes of investigating or preventing the conduct described in this section unless disclosure is required by this act, the commissioner, other law, or court order, or unless the sports governing body consents to disclosure. The information may not be used for any commercial or other purpose. new text end new text begin (d) Notwithstanding paragraph (c), a sports governing body may make disclosures necessary to conduct and resolve integrity-related investigations and may publicly disclose such information if required by the sports governing body's integrity policies or if deemed by the sports governing body in its reasonable judgment to be necessary to maintain the actual or perceived integrity of its sporting events. Prior to any such public disclosure that would identify the mobile sports betting operator by name, the sports governing body will provide the mobile sports betting operator with notice of such disclosure and an opportunity to object to such disclosure. new text end Sec. 20. new text begin [299L.53] RECORD KEEPING; INFORMATION SHARING. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Record retention. new text end new text begin (a) Mobile sports betting operators or mobile sports betting platform providers shall maintain records of all bets and wagers placed, including personally identifiable information of an authorized participant, amount and type of wager, time the wager was placed, location of the wager, including IP address if applicable, the outcome of the wager, and records of abnormal betting activity for 3.5 years after the sporting event occurs. new text end new text begin (b) Mobile sports betting operators or mobile sports betting platform providers shall make the data described in paragraph (a) available for inspection upon request of the commissioner or as required by court order. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Anonymization required. new text end new text begin Mobile sports betting operators or mobile sports betting platform providers shall use commercially reasonable efforts to maintain in real time and at the account level anonymized information regarding an authorized participant, amount and type of wager, the time the wager was placed, the location of the wager, including the IP address if applicable, the outcome of the wager, and records of abnormal betting activity. Nothing in this section shall require a mobile sports betting operator and mobile sports betting platform provider to provide any information that is prohibited by federal, state, or local laws or regulations, including laws and regulations relating to privacy and personally identifiable information. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Information sharing. new text end new text begin (a) If a sports governing body has notified the commissioner that access to the information described in subdivision 2 for wagers placed on sporting events of the sports governing body is necessary to monitor the integrity of such body's sporting events, then mobile sports betting operators shall share, in a commercially reasonable frequency, form, and manner, with the sports governing body or its designees the information under subdivision 2 with respect to sports wagers on sporting events of such sports governing body. new text end new text begin (b) Sports governing bodies and their designees may only use information received under this section for integrity-monitoring purposes and may not use information received under this section for any commercial or other purpose. new text end new text begin (c) Nothing in this section shall require a mobile sports betting operator and mobile sports betting platform provider to provide any information that is prohibited by federal, state, or local laws or regulations, including without limitation laws and regulations relating to privacy and personally identifiable information. new text end Sec. 21. new text begin [299L.55] INSPECTION AND AUDITING. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Inspection. new text end new text begin The commissioner, the commissioner of revenue, and the director are authorized to inspect the accounting records of mobile sports betting operators and mobile sports betting platform providers at any time provided the mobile sports betting operators and mobile sports betting platform provider is given notice at least 24 hours before the inspection. This provision only applies to mobile sports betting operations and does not authorize the inspection of records related to Tribal gaming operations, Tribal governmental records, or class III sports betting operations conducted exclusively on Indian Lands. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Annual audit. new text end new text begin To ensure compliance with this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter, a mobile sports betting operator and mobile sports betting platform provider must contract with an independent third party to perform a financial audit, consistent with the standards established by the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board or using the Statements on Accounting standards issued by the Audit Standards Board of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants. The mobile sports betting operator must submit the audit to the commissioner for examination and inspection within 120 days of the end of its fiscal year. new text end Sec. 22. new text begin [299L.60] LICENSE VIOLATIONS; ENFORCEMENT. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Schedule of penalties. new text end new text begin The commissioner must adopt rules that provide a graduated schedule of penalties for violations of license requirements under statute or rule. The schedule must specify penalties that may range from warnings and probation periods to civil fines, temporary suspension of licenses, or revocation of licenses. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Authority to act. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner may issue administrative orders, impose civil penalties, and suspend, revoke, or not renew a license issued pursuant to sections 299L.10 to 299L.80 if the commissioner determines that a licensee has committed or is about to commit a violation of those sections or rules adopted pursuant to those sections, or if the commissioner determines that the licensee is disqualified or ineligible to hold a license pursuant to section 299L.25 or 299L.26. A conviction for a violation of section 299L.80 is not required for the commissioner to take action on a violation. new text end new text begin (b) Enforcement actions, license suspensions, license revocations, or license nonrenewals related to a specific mobile sports betting operator shall not impact or limit the ability of another mobile sports betting operator to conduct, offer, or offer for play mobile sports betting. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Temporary suspension. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner may temporarily, without hearing, suspend the license and operating privilege of any licensee for a period of up to 90 days if there is clear and convincing evidence that: new text end new text begin (1) conduct of a licensee, or anticipated failure of a licensee to fulfill an obligation, requires immediate action to protect the public from harm; new text end new text begin (2) the licensee has not timely filed a tax return or paid the tax required under chapter 297J; or new text end new text begin (3) the licensee has not timely paid all fees due under sections 299L.10 to 299L.80. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner shall notify the licensee of the violation that caused the temporary suspension and may lift the temporary suspension if the licensee corrects the violation. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner may extend the period of suspension if the violation is not corrected, the commissioner notifies the business that it intends to revoke or not renew a license, and a contested case hearing has not taken place. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Notice of violation; administrative orders; request for reconsideration; demand for hearing. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner may issue an administrative order to any licensee who has committed a violation. The order may require the licensee to correct the violation or to cease and desist from committing the violation and may impose civil penalties. The order must state the deficiencies that constitute a violation, the time by which the violation must be corrected, and the amount of any civil penalty. new text end new text begin (b) If the licensee believes the information in the administrative order is in error, the licensee may ask the commissioner to reconsider any parts of the order that are alleged to be in error. The request must be in writing, delivered to the commissioner by certified mail within seven days after receipt of the order, and provide documentation to support the allegation of error. The commissioner must respond to a request for reconsideration within 15 days after receiving the request. A request for reconsideration does not stay the order unless the commissioner issues a supplemental order granting additional time. The commissioner's disposition of a request for reconsideration is final. new text end new text begin (c) An administrative order that imposes a civil penalty of more than $2,000 shall be treated as a contested case under chapter 14. new text end new text begin (d) A licensee may request a hearing on the administrative order within 30 days of the service of the order. The request must be in writing and delivered to the commissioner by certified mail. If the licensee does not request a hearing within 30 days, the order becomes final. new text end new text begin (e) If the licensee requests a hearing, the hearing must be held not later than 30 days after the commissioner receives the request unless the licensee and the commissioner agree on a later date. After the hearing, the commissioner may enter an order making such disposition as the facts require. If the licensee fails to appear at the hearing after having been notified of it, the licensee is considered in default and the proceeding may be determined against the licensee on consideration of the administrative order, the allegations of which may be considered to be true. An action of the commissioner under this paragraph is subject to judicial review pursuant to chapter 14. new text end new text begin (f) Civil penalties collected by the commissioner shall be deposited in the general fund. Civil penalties may be recovered in a civil action in the name of the state brought in the district court. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Revocation, nonrenewal, civil penalties; contested case. new text end new text begin If the commissioner intends to revoke or not renew a license, or impose a civil penalty in excess of $2,000, the commissioner shall provide the licensee with a statement of the complaints made against the licensee and shall initiate a contested case proceeding. The contested case shall be held pursuant to chapter 14. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Penalties. new text end new text begin In addition to penalties listed in this section, a person or licensee who violates the provisions of sections 299L.10 to 299L.80 is subject to any applicable criminal penalty. new text end Sec. 23. new text begin [299L.61] DUTY TO WARN; DUTY OF CARE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Duties owed. new text end new text begin A mobile sports betting platform provider owes the following duties: new text end new text begin (1) a duty to warn individuals placing a wager about the health and financial risks associated with sports betting; new text end new text begin (2) a duty to monitor an individual's behavior related to the placement of wagers and intervene when an individual shows signs of hazardous or addictive behavior; and new text end new text begin (3) the duty to take reasonable measures to reduce the harm associated with sports betting to an individual placing a wager. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Liability. new text end new text begin (a) In addition to the remedies otherwise provided by law, an individual, an individual's family member, or an individual's employer injured by a violation of this section may bring an action against the mobile sports betting platform provider and recover damages, including damages for mental anguish or suffering; costs and disbursements, including costs of investigation and reasonable attorney fees; and receive other equitable relief as determined by the court. new text end new text begin (b) In addition to the remedies under paragraph (a), if a platform provider fails to restrict a person's wagering after receiving a red flag warning under section 299L.45, a plaintiff may recover an amount up to three times the amount of damages sustained. new text end new text begin (c) Evidence of compliance with section 299L.45 must not be used to reduce liability under this section or any other law. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Waiver prohibited. new text end new text begin The rights and duties established under this section may not be waived or modified. Any agreement that violates this subdivision is contrary to public policy and is void and unenforceable. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to causes of actions accruing on or after that date. new text end Sec. 24. new text begin [299L.62] PRIVATE REMEDIES; DECEPTIVE PRACTICES. new text end new text begin In addition to the remedies otherwise provided by law, an individual injured by a violation of section 299L.37, 325E.42, or 325F.67 may bring a civil action against a mobile sports betting platform provider and recover damages; costs and disbursements, including costs of investigation; and reasonable attorney fees and receive other equitable relief as determined by the court. An action brought under this section benefits the public. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to causes of actions accruing on or after that date. new text end Sec. 25. new text begin [299L.65] REPORTING. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Financial report. new text end new text begin By June 1 of each year, the commissioner must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over public safety, the legislative committees with jurisdiction over taxes, the committee in the house of representatives with jurisdiction over commerce, the committee in the senate with jurisdiction over state government finance and policy, the committee in the house of representatives with jurisdiction over ways and means, and the committee in the senate with jurisdiction over finance. The report must describe the activities of the commissioner with respect to wagering on sporting events and include summary financial information on sports betting and the regulated sports betting industry as a whole. The report must not include information or data on individuals or entities that is classified as private data under section 299L.70 or separately list the earnings, wagers, or tax revenue generated by or use identifying information for specific mobile sports betting operators. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin License activity report. new text end new text begin By February 1 of each year beginning in 2026, the commissioner shall submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the committees in the house of representatives and the senate with jurisdiction over public safety, the committee in the house of representatives with jurisdiction over commerce, and the committee in the senate with jurisdiction over state government finance and policy on the following: new text end new text begin (1) the status of applications for licenses issued by the commissioner, including the number of applications for each type of license, the number of licenses of each type issued, and the average time between receipt of a complete application and issuance of each type of license; new text end new text begin (2) an overview of the sports betting market, including but not limited to the actual and anticipated demand; new text end new text begin (3) the amount of revenue generated to the state by sports betting and the expenses incurred by the commissioner in enforcing restrictions on lawful sports betting; and new text end new text begin (4) the commissioner's enforcement actions taken against persons licensed under sections 299L.10 to 299L.80 for licensing violations, including violations of the rules adopted under section 299L.15. new text end Sec. 26. new text begin [299L.655] STUDY ON THE PREVALENCE OF GAMBLING; APPROPRIATION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Baseline study. new text end new text begin The commissioner must commission a study on gambling activity in Minnesota prior to the implementation of sports betting in Minnesota. The study must determine the prevalence of gambling in the state and the incidence of problem gambling, identifying the number of people who participate in various forms of gambling. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Continued study. new text end new text begin Three years after the baseline study, and every three years thereafter, the commissioner must commission an update for the study of the prevalence of gambling and the incidence and level of problem gambling. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, before the distribution required under section 297J.02, subdivision 7, paragraph (b), $....... is appropriated from the sports betting revenue account in the special revenue fund to the commissioner of public safety for the study required in subdivision 2. The commissioner may contract with a third party to conduct the study. new text end Sec. 27. new text begin [299L.6556] STUDY ON THE IMPACT OF SPORTS BETTING ON PROBLEM GAMBLING, GAMBLING DISORDERS, YOUTH GAMBLING, AND SUICIDE. new text end new text begin The commissioner must commission a study on the impact of sports betting on the prevalence of gambling disorders, suicide related to gambling disorders, and risks to youth of developing gambling disorders, based on any research available on how sports betting has impacted these problems in jurisdictions where sports betting is occurring. new text end Sec. 28. new text begin [299L.70] DATA PROTECTIONS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Classification. new text end new text begin Data in which an individual who has wagered on sporting events is identified by name, account number, Social Security number, or any other uniquely identifying indicia, is private data on individuals, as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 12. Data on individual earnings of mobile sports betting operators, mobile sports betting platform providers, mobile sports betting operator application and licensing information, mobile sports betting platform provider application and licensing information, and all Tribal revenue records unassociated with mobile sports betting operators is nonpublic data, as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 9. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Sale of private data on individuals. new text end new text begin The commissioner shall revoke any license issued under sections 299L.10 to 299L.80 of a person who sells data on individuals that would be classified as private under subdivision 1 collected through the practice of sports betting, unless sharing of that data is otherwise allowed in this act. new text end Sec. 29. new text begin [299L.75] LOCAL RESTRICTIONS; PROHIBITION ON LOCAL TAXES OR FEES. new text end new text begin No political subdivision may require a local license to offer sports betting or impose a tax or fee on the sports betting conducted pursuant to this chapter. new text end Sec. 30. new text begin [299L.79] REVIEW OF OTHER STATES' RESTRICTIONS. new text end new text begin The commissioner must review the laws of other states in which wagering on sports is regulated to identify restrictions and safeguards on sports wagering that would be advisable to ensure the integrity of sports betting and to provide effective safety measures to protect people with a gambling disorder or who are at risk of developing a gambling disorder. The commissioner must adopt rules to implement the restrictions and safeguards the commissioner identifies from other states as advisable under this section. By January 15 of each year, the commissioner shall report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the committees in the house of representatives and the senate with jurisdiction over sports wagering on advisable restrictions and safeguards, including draft legislation to implement the additional restrictions or safeguards. new text end Sec. 31. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 325E.42, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Attorney general's actions. The attorney general may bring an action against any person violating this section in accordance with section 8.31deleted text begin , except that no private action is permitted to redress or correct a violation of this sectiondeleted text end . Sec. 32. new text begin INDIAN TRIBES; COMPACTS TO BE NEGOTIATED.new text end new text begin The governor or the governor's designated representatives shall negotiate in good faith new Tribal-state compacts regulating the conduct of class III sports betting on the Indian lands of an Indian Tribe requesting negotiations, under Minnesota Statutes, section 3.9221. Compacts in effect on January 1, 2023, shall not be modified to accommodate sports betting. new text end Sec. 33. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin (a) $....... in fiscal year 2025 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety for the study required under Minnesota Statutes, section 299L.655, subdivision 1. The commissioner may contract with a third party to conduct the study. This appropriation is onetime. new text end new text begin (b) $....... in fiscal year 2025 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety for the study required under Minnesota Statutes, section 299L.6556. The commissioner may contract with a third party to conduct the study. This appropriation is onetime. new text end ARTICLE 2 TAXATION OF SPORTS BETTING Section 1. new text begin [297J.01] DEFINITIONS. new text end new text begin Unless otherwise defined in this chapter, or unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the following terms have the meanings given: new text end new text begin (1) "commissioner" means the commissioner of revenue; new text end new text begin (2) "mobile sports betting operator" has the meaning given in section 299L.10, subdivision 14; new text end new text begin (3) "mobile sports betting platform provider" has the meaning given in section 299L.10, subdivision 16; new text end new text begin (4) "sporting event" has the meaning given in section 299L.10, subdivision 18; new text end new text begin (5) "sports betting" has the meaning given in section 299L.10, subdivision 19; new text end new text begin (6) "sports betting net revenue" means the total of all cash and cash equivalents received in a month by a mobile sports betting operator from wagers on sporting events, including the amount of cash or cash equivalents received for promotional credits or free bets, less the following: new text end new text begin (i) cash paid out as winnings in the month; new text end new text begin (ii) the cash equivalent of noncash prizes paid out as winnings in the month; new text end new text begin (iii) cash and cash equivalents received by a mobile sports betting operator or mobile sports betting platform provider for activities other than sports betting; and new text end new text begin (iv) excise taxes paid to the federal government; and new text end new text begin (7) "wager" has the meaning given in section 299L.10, subdivision 22. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for sports betting net revenue received after December 31, 2025. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [297J.02] TAX ON SPORTS BETTING NET REVENUE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Tax imposed. new text end new text begin (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b), a tax is imposed on sports betting net revenue received equal to the rate determined pursuant to section 299L.78, subdivision 7, on wagers placed online through a website or mobile application, as allowed under section 299L.40. new text end new text begin (b) Any wager placed on Indian lands is not subject to state taxation. For purposes of this chapter, a wager is placed at the physical location of the individual placing the wager. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Sports betting net revenue tax in lieu of other taxes. new text end new text begin (a) Income derived by a mobile sports betting operator or mobile sports betting platform provider from the conduct of wagering on a sporting event is not subject to the tax imposed in chapter 290. Wagers accepted by a mobile sports betting operator are not subject to the tax imposed in section 297A.62 or 297E.03. new text end new text begin (b) When sports betting net revenue for a month is less than zero, the commissioner must allow the mobile sports betting operator or mobile sports betting platform provider to carry over the negative amount to returns filed for subsequent months. The negative amount of sports betting net revenue may not be carried back to an earlier month and remittances previously received by the commissioner will not be refunded, except if the mobile sports betting operator or mobile sports betting platform provider surrenders its mobile sports betting license and the last return reported a negative amount of sports betting net revenue. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Returns; due dates. new text end new text begin A mobile sports betting operator or mobile sports betting platform provider must file a return by the 20th day of each month reporting the tax due under this section for the preceding month. The return must include the amount of all wagers received, payouts made, all sports betting taxes owed, and other information required by the commissioner. The tax under this chapter is due to be paid to the commissioner on the day the return is due. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Public information. new text end new text begin All records concerning the administration of taxes under this chapter are classified as public information. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Refunds. new text end new text begin A person who has, under this chapter, paid to the commissioner an amount of tax for a period in excess of the amount legally due for that period may file with the commissioner a claim for a refund of the excess. The amount necessary to pay the refunds under this subdivision is appropriated from the sports betting revenue account established in subdivision 7 to the commissioner. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Extensions. new text end new text begin If in the commissioner's judgment good cause exists, the commissioner may extend the time for filing tax returns, paying taxes, or both under this section for not more than six months. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Distribution of funds. new text end new text begin (a) The sports betting revenue account is established in the special revenue fund. All amounts collected by the commissioner under this chapter must be deposited in the account and distributed as provided in this subdivision. Any money remaining in the account at the end of each fiscal year does not cancel. Interest and income earned on money in the account, after deducting any applicable charges, shall be credited to the account. new text end new text begin (b) Of the amount in the sports betting revenue account: new text end new text begin (1) fifty percent is appropriated to the commissioner of human services of which half is for the compulsive gambling treatment program established under section 245.98, and half is for a grant to the state affiliate recognized by the National Council on Problem Gambling to be used to increase public awareness of problem gambling, provide education and training for individuals and organizations providing effective treatment services to problem gamblers and their families, and research relating to problem gambling. Money appropriated by this clause must supplement and must not replace existing state funding for these programs; new text end new text begin (2) twenty-five percent shall be transferred to the general fund; and new text end new text begin (3) twenty-five percent is appropriated to the commissioner of education for grants for addiction prevention and mental health services in public schools, as defined in section 120A.05, subdivisions 9, 11, 13, and 17, and charter schools formed under chapter 124E. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for sports betting net revenue received after December 31, 2025, except that subdivision 7 is effective January 1, 2025, and applies to license and renewal fees received after December 31, 2024, and sports betting net revenue received after December 31, 2025. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [297J.03] MOBILE SPORTS BETTING OPERATOR REPORTS AND RECORDS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Business records. new text end new text begin A mobile sports betting operator or mobile sports betting platform provider must maintain records supporting the sports betting activity and taxes owed. Records required to be kept in this section must be preserved by the mobile sports betting operator or mobile sports betting platform provider for at least 3-1/2 years after the return is due or filed, whichever is later, and may be inspected by the commissioner at any reasonable time without notice or a search warrant. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Audits. new text end new text begin The commissioner may require a financial audit of a mobile sports betting operator's or mobile sports betting platform provider's sports betting activities if the mobile sports betting operator or mobile sports betting platform provider has failed to comply with this chapter as it relates to financial reporting. Audits must be performed by an independent accountant licensed according to chapter 326A. The commissioner must prescribe standards for an audit required under this subdivision. A complete, true, and correct copy of an audit must be filed as prescribed by the commissioner. Nothing in this subdivision limits the commissioner's ability to conduct its own audit pursuant to its authority under chapter 270C. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for sports betting net revenue received after December 31, 2025. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin [297J.04] OTHER PROVISIONS APPLY. new text end new text begin Except for those provisions specific to distributors, gambling products, or gambling equipment, sections 297E.11 to 297E.14 apply to this chapter. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for sports betting net revenue received after December 31, 2025. new text end ARTICLE 3 CRIMES RELATED TO SPORTS BETTING Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 260B.007, subdivision 16, is amended to read: Subd. 16. Juvenile petty offender; juvenile petty offense. (a) "Juvenile petty offense" includes a juvenile alcohol offense, a juvenile controlled substance offense, new text begin a juvenile violation of section 299L.80, subdivision 3, paragraph (a), new text end a violation of section 609.685, or a violation of a local ordinance, which by its terms prohibits conduct by a child under the age of 18 years which would be lawful conduct if committed by an adult. (b) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (c), "juvenile petty offense" also includes an offense that would be a misdemeanor if committed by an adult. (c) "Juvenile petty offense" does not include any of the following: (1) a misdemeanor-level violation of section 518B.01, 588.20, 609.224, 609.2242, 609.324, subdivision 2 or 3, 609.5632, 609.576, 609.66, 609.746, 609.748, 609.79, or 617.23; (2) a major traffic offense or an adult court traffic offense, as described in section 260B.225; (3) a misdemeanor-level offense committed by a child whom the juvenile court previously has found to have committed a misdemeanor, gross misdemeanor, or felony offense; or (4) a misdemeanor-level offense committed by a child whom the juvenile court has found to have committed a misdemeanor-level juvenile petty offense on two or more prior occasions, unless the county attorney designates the child on the petition as a juvenile petty offender notwithstanding this prior record. As used in this clause, "misdemeanor-level juvenile petty offense" includes a misdemeanor-level offense that would have been a juvenile petty offense if it had been committed on or after July 1, 1995. (d) A child who commits a juvenile petty offense is a "juvenile petty offender." The term juvenile petty offender does not include a child alleged to have violated any law relating to being hired, offering to be hired, or agreeing to be hired by another individual to engage in sexual penetration or sexual conduct which, if committed by an adult, would be a misdemeanor. (e) Effective August 1, 2026, and applied to acts committed on or after that date, notwithstanding any contrary provision in paragraphs (a) to (d), a juvenile petty offender does not include a child who is alleged to have committed a juvenile petty offense before reaching the age of 13 years. Sec. 2. new text begin [299L.80] CRIMES RELATING TO WAGERING ON SPORTING EVENTS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin As used in this section: new text end new text begin (1) "accepts a wager" includes receiving, recording, or forwarding a wager or an offer to wager on a sporting event, and attempts to do so; new text end new text begin (2) "nonpublic information" means information regarding a participant's ability or likelihood to perform in a sporting event that: new text end new text begin (i) is not available to the general public; new text end new text begin (ii) is derived from a personal or professional relationship with the participant; and new text end new text begin (iii) if the information was disseminated, would likely affect the odds of the participant or the participant's team in achieving a particular outcome in the event; and new text end new text begin (3) "places a wager" includes an offer or attempt to place a wager on a sporting event. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Sale or transfer of private data. new text end new text begin (a) Whoever sells or transfers private data on individuals collected through the practice of wagering on sporting events is guilty of a misdemeanor. new text end new text begin (b) Paragraph (a) does not apply to the transfer of data between a person licensed under section 299L.10 to 299L.80 or an employee of a licensee and the commissioner, the director, or the commissioner of revenue when that transfer is necessary to perform duties prescribed by law relating to wagering on sporting events or to information shared with a sports governing body pursuant to section 299L.53, subdivision 3. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Wagering by a person under age 21. new text end new text begin (a) A person who is under 21 years of age and does either of the following is guilty of a misdemeanor: new text end new text begin (1) places a wager on a sporting event; or new text end new text begin (2) misrepresents the person's age as being 21 or older for the purposes of placing a wager on a sporting event. new text end new text begin (b) A person licensed under sections 299L.10 to 299L.80 or an employee of a licensee who knowingly accepts a wager on a sporting event placed by someone under the age of 21 years is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. new text end new text begin (c) Paragraph (a), clause (1) does not prohibit private social bets on sporting events that are not part of or incidental to organized, commercialized, or systematic gambling. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Unauthorized wagers. new text end new text begin (a) The following persons who place a wager with an entity licensed under sections 299L.10 to 299L.80 are guilty of a crime and may be sentenced as provided in paragraphs (b) to (e): new text end new text begin (1) a person who is a participant in a sporting event and who places a wager on that event or who induces another to place a wager on the event on behalf of the person; new text end new text begin (2) a person licensed under sections 299L.10 to 299L.80, or an employee of a licensee whose exclusive or primary responsibilities involve mobile sports betting, who places a wager on a sporting event on an online website or mobile application with which the person is affiliated; new text end new text begin (3) an officer, director, member, or employee of the Division of Alcohol and Gambling Enforcement of the Department of Public Safety or the division who places a wager on a sporting event, unless the person is a peace officer with the Division of Alcohol and Gambling Enforcement who places a wager as part of a criminal or regulatory investigation; or new text end new text begin (4) a person who possesses nonpublic information on a sporting event and who places a wager on that event. new text end new text begin (b) A person who violates paragraph (a) is guilty of a misdemeanor if the amount of the wager is no more than $500. new text end new text begin (c) A person who violates paragraph (a) is guilty of a gross misdemeanor if: new text end new text begin (1) the person has previously been convicted of a violation of this section or section 609.76; or new text end new text begin (2) the amount of the wager is more than $500 but not more than $1,000. new text end new text begin (d) A person who violates paragraph (a) is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than two years or to payment of a fine of not more than $4,000, or both, if the amount of the wager is more than $1,000 but not more than $5,000. new text end new text begin (e) A person who violates paragraph (a) is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than five years or to payment of a fine of not more than $10,000, or both, if: new text end new text begin (1) the amount of the wager is more than $5,000; or new text end new text begin (2) the person places more than five wagers on any one or more sporting events within any 30-day period and the total amount wagered is more than $2,500. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Unauthorized acceptance of wagers. new text end new text begin (a) A person licensed under sections 299L.10 to 299L.80, or an employee of a licensee whose exclusive or primary responsibilities involve mobile sports betting, who accepts a wager on a sporting event knowing that the wager was made in violation of subdivision 4, paragraph (a) is guilty of a crime and may be sentenced as provided in paragraphs (b) to (e). new text end new text begin (b) A person who violates paragraph (a) is guilty of a misdemeanor if the amount of the wager is no more than $500. new text end new text begin (c) A person who violates paragraph (a) is guilty of a gross misdemeanor if: new text end new text begin (1) the person has previously been convicted of a violation of this section or section 609.76; or new text end new text begin (2) the amount of the wager is more than $500 but not more than $1,000. new text end new text begin (d) A person who violates paragraph (a) is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than two years or to payment of a fine of not more than $4,000, or both, if the amount of the wager is more than $1,000 but not more than $5,000. new text end new text begin (e) A person who violates paragraph (a) is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than five years or to payment of a fine of not more than $10,000, or both, if: new text end new text begin (1) the amount of the wager is more than $5,000; or new text end new text begin (2) the person accepts one or more wagers knowing that: new text end new text begin (i) the wager is prohibited under subdivision 4, paragraph (a); new text end new text begin (ii) acceptance of the wager will result in the person making a wager having placed more than five wagers on any one or more sporting events within any 30-day period; and new text end new text begin (iii) the total amount wagered is more than $2,500. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Aggregation; venue. new text end new text begin In any prosecution under subdivision 4 or 5, the amount of money wagered within any six-month period may be aggregated and the accused charged accordingly in applying the provisions of those subdivisions. In addition, when two or more offenses are committed by the same person in two or more counties, the accused may be prosecuted in any county in which one of the offenses was committed for all of the offenses aggregated under this subdivision. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Proof of age; defense; seizure of false identification. new text end new text begin (a) Proof of age for placing a wager under sections 299L.10 to 299L.80 on a sporting event may be established only by one of the following: new text end new text begin (1) a valid driver's license or identification card issued by Minnesota, another state, a Tribal government, or a province of Canada, that includes the photograph and date of birth of the person; new text end new text begin (2) a valid military identification card issued by the United States Department of Defense; new text end new text begin (3) a valid United States passport; new text end new text begin (4) a valid instructional permit issued under section 171.05 that includes a photograph and the date of birth of the person; new text end new text begin (5) a Tribal identification; new text end new text begin (6) in the case of a foreign national, a valid passport; or new text end new text begin (7) use of an identity verification process approved by the commissioner and implemented by the mobile sports betting operator or mobile sports betting platform provider. new text end new text begin (b) In a prosecution for accepting a wager on a sporting event from a person under the age of 21, it is an affirmative defense for the defendant to prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the defendant reasonably and in good faith relied upon representations of proof of age authorized in paragraph (a). new text end new text begin (c) A mobile sports betting operator or employee of a mobile sports betting operator, or an official or employee authorized to accept wagers on sporting events under a Tribal-state compact regulating the conduct of class III sports betting on the Indian lands of an Indian Tribe, may seize a form of identification listed under paragraph (a) if the person has reasonable grounds to believe that the form of identification has been altered or falsified or is being used to violate any law. A person who seizes a form of identification under this paragraph must deliver it to a law enforcement agency, as defined in section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraph (f), within 24 hours of seizure. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Advertising and promotion to person under self-imposed restrictions. new text end new text begin A person licensed under sections 299L.10 to 299L.80, or an employee of a licensee whose exclusive or primary responsibilities involve mobile sports betting, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor if the person markets sports betting to another person through a text, a message within a mobile sports betting application, or another direct message to that person during a time that the other person has implemented self-imposed prohibitions on that person participating in sports betting under section 299L.45. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.75, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. What are not bets. The following are not bets: (1) a contract to insure, indemnify, guarantee or otherwise compensate another for a harm or loss sustained, even though the loss depends upon chance; (2) a contract for the purchase or sale at a future date of securities or other commodities; (3) offers of purses, prizes or premiums to the actual contestants in any bona fide contest for the determination of skill, speed, strength, endurance, or quality or to the bona fide owners of animals or other property entered in such a contest; (4) the game of bingo when conducted in compliance with sections 349.11 to 349.23; (5) a private social bet not part of or incidental to organized, commercialized, or systematic gambling; (6) the operation of equipment or the conduct of a raffle under sections 349.11 to 349.22, by an organization licensed by the Gambling Control Board or an organization exempt from licensing under section 349.166; (7) pari-mutuel betting on horse racing when the betting is conducted under chapter 240; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (8) the purchase and sale of State Lottery tickets under chapter 349Anew text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (9) sports betting when the betting is conducted pursuant to sections 299L.10 to 299L.80new text end . Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.75, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Gambling device. A gambling device is a contrivance the purpose of which is that for a consideration a player is afforded an opportunity to obtain something of value, other than free plays, automatically from the machine or otherwise, the award of which is determined principally by chance, whether or not the contrivance is actually played. "Gambling device" also includes a video game of chance, as defined in subdivision 8.new text begin Gambling device does not include a website or mobile application, or device used for accessing the website or mobile application, authorized to be used in conducting mobile sports betting pursuant to sections 299L.10 to 299L.80.new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.75, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Sports bookmaking. Sports bookmaking is the activity of intentionally receiving, recording or forwarding within any 30-day period more than five bets, or offers to bet, that total more than $2,500 on any one or more sporting events.new text begin Sports bookmaking does not include sports betting when the betting is conducted pursuant to sections 299L.10 to 299L.80.new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.75, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7a. new text end new text begin Sporting event. new text end new text begin "Sporting event" has the meaning given in section 299L.10, subdivision 18, and includes any event, such as a game, match, contest, or activity, or series of games, matches, contests, activities, or tournaments, involving the athletic skill or performance in a video game of one or more players or participants, regardless of whether the event is approved by the commissioner to be an event eligible for wagering under sections 299L.10 to 299L.80. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.755, is amended to read: 609.755 GAMBLING; MISDEMEANOR. Whoever does any of the following is guilty of a misdemeanor: (1) makes a betnew text begin , other than a bet on a sporting eventnew text end ; (2) sells or transfers a chance to participate in a lottery; (3) disseminates information about a lottery, except a lottery conducted by an adjoining state, with intent to encourage participation therein; (4) permits a structure or location owned or occupied by the actor or under the actor's control to be used as a gambling place; or (5) except where authorized by statute, possesses a gambling device. Clause (5) does not prohibit possession of a gambling device in a person's dwelling for amusement purposes in a manner that does not afford players an opportunity to obtain anything of value. Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.76, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Sports bookmaking. new text begin (a) Whoever makes a bet on a sporting event with a person who is not licensed to engage in sports betting under sections 299L.10 to 299L.80 is guilty of a misdemeanor if the amount of the wager is no more than $500. new text end new text begin (b) Whoever makes a bet on a sporting event with a person who is not licensed to engage in sports betting under sections 299L.10 to 299L.80 is guilty of a gross misdemeanor if: new text end new text begin (1) the person has previously been convicted of a violation of this section or section 609.76; or new text end new text begin (2) the amount of the wager is more than $500 but not more than $1,000. new text end new text begin (c) Whoever makes a bet on a sporting event with a person who is not licensed to engage in sports betting under sections 299L.10 to 299L.80 is guilty of a felony if the amount of the wager is more than $1,000. new text end new text begin (d) new text end Whoever engages in sports bookmaking is guilty of a felony. new text begin (e) In any prosecution under paragraph (b) or (c), the amount of money wagered within any six-month period may be aggregated and the accused charged accordingly in applying the provisions of those paragraphs. In addition, when two or more offenses are committed by the same person in two or more counties, the accused may be prosecuted in any county in which one of the offenses was committed for all of the offenses aggregated under this subdivision. new text end Sec. 9. new text begin [609.764] SPORTING EVENTS; FRAUD; BRIBERY. new text end new text begin (a) As used in this section: new text end new text begin (1) "participant in a sporting event" has the meaning given in section 299L.10, subdivision 17; and new text end new text begin (2) "sporting event" has the meaning given in section 299L.10, subdivision 18. new text end new text begin (b) A person is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than five years or to payment of a fine of not more than $10,000, or both, if the person: new text end new text begin (1) offers, gives, or promises to give, directly or indirectly, to a participant in a sporting event any benefit, reward, or consideration to which the participant is not legally entitled as compensation or a prize, with intent to influence the performance of the participant, or the outcome of the event or a component of the event; or new text end new text begin (2) as a participant in a sporting event, requests, receives, or agrees to receive, directly or indirectly, a benefit, reward, or consideration to which the participant is not legally entitled to intentionally lose, cause to lose, or attempt to lose or cause to lose the event, or to intentionally perform below abilities to adversely affect the outcome of the event or a component of the event. new text end Sec. 10. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin Sections 1 to 9 are effective the day that sports betting becomes lawful under article 1 and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end ARTICLE 4 APPROPRIATIONS Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245.98, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Program. The commissioner of human services shall establish a program for the treatment of compulsive gamblersnew text begin and their familiesnew text end . The commissioner may contract with an entity with expertise regarding the treatment of compulsive gambling to operate the program. The program may include the establishment of a statewide toll-free number, resource library, public education programs; regional in-service training programs and conferences for health care professionals, educators, treatment providers, employee assistance programs, and criminal justice representatives; and the establishment of certification standards for programs and service providers. The commissioner may enter into agreements with other entities and may employ or contract with consultants to facilitate the provision of these services or the training of individuals to qualify them to provide these services.new text begin The program must include up to 60 hours of intervention services for a family member or concerned significant other who is a Minnesota resident and is negatively impacted by problem or compulsive gambling.new text end The program may also include inpatient and outpatient treatment and rehabilitation services for residents in different settings, including a temporary or permanent residential setting for mental health or substance use disorder, and individuals in jails or correctional facilities. The program may also include research studies. The research studies must include baseline and prevalence studies for adolescents and adults to identify those at the highest risk. The program must be approved by the commissioner before it is established. Sec. 2. new text begin STUDY ON MOTIVATIONS AND BELIEFS OF YOUNG ADULT GAMBLERS; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, before the distribution required under Minnesota Statutes, section 297J.02, subdivision 7, paragraph (b), $150,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the sports betting revenue account in the special revenue fund to the commissioner of public safety for a grant to a nonprofit organization to conduct a study on the gambling motivations and beliefs of young adult gamblers. The commissioner may not use any amount of this appropriation to administer the grant. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Award. new text end new text begin The commissioner shall award the grant to a nonprofit, gambling-neutral organization with experience raising public awareness about problem gambling and providing professional training for those who work with problem gamblers. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Focus group. new text end new text begin (a) The grant recipient shall convene a focus group of no more than 40 individuals who are at least 18 years of age but not more than 35 years of age and who have experience gambling in Minnesota. new text end new text begin (b) Membership of the focus group shall reflect the geographical and demographic diversity of Minnesotans who are 18 to 35 years of age. new text end new text begin (c) The focus group shall identify the reasons that young adults gamble and the ways in which they engage in gambling, including whether they wager on sporting events; participate in fantasy sports; purchase lottery tickets; visit casinos; engage in online gambling; participate in card playing as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 240.01, subdivision 5; engage in pari-mutuel betting as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 240.01, subdivision 14; or participate in lawful gambling authorized under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 349. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Qualitative survey. new text end new text begin Following completion of the focus group described in subdivision 3, the grant recipient shall create a qualitative survey from a sample of at least 50,000 individuals. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin By January 15, 2027, the grant recipient shall submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over public safety, the legislative committees with jurisdiction over taxes, the committee in the house of representatives with jurisdiction over commerce, the committee in the senate with jurisdiction over state government finance and policy, the committee in the house of representatives with jurisdiction over ways and means, and the committee in the senate with jurisdiction over finance. The report shall summarize the actions and findings of the grant recipient and shall make recommendations for policies and the use of financial resources to prevent and address problem gambling by young adults. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $6,598,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund and $3,952,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the sports betting revenue account in the special revenue fund to the commissioner of public safety to perform the duties required to establish and regulate mobile sports betting under Minnesota Statutes, sections 299L.10 to 299L.80. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $1,852,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund and $1,633,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the sports betting revenue account in the special revenue fund to the commissioner of revenue to perform the duties necessary to establish and enforce the taxation of mobile sports betting. new text end ARTICLE 5 SELECTION OF PLATFORM PROVIDERS Section 1. new text begin [299L.78] REQUESTS FOR PROPOSALS FOR PLATFORM PROVIDERS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Competitive bidding process. new text end new text begin The commissioner of public safety may issue licenses to platform providers who have been selected for licensure by the commissioner after a competitive bidding process. The commissioner must issue a request for applications within six months from the effective date of this section, with a deadline to submit applications within 30 days of the issuing date of the request for applications. The commissioner of public safety may work with the commissioner of administration to facilitate the bidding process. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Timeline; disqualifications. new text end new text begin The commissioner must evaluate platform providers within 150 days of the due date for applications. The commissioner must disqualify applications from platform providers that do not demonstrate that they meet the requirements for licensure under sections 299L.25 and 299L.29. The commissioner must disqualify an application submitted jointly by more than one competing platform provider. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Application. new text end new text begin The commissioner must determine the form of the application for bidding to be a platform provider. The application must include at least the following information: new text end new text begin (1) a matrix to indicate the percentage of gross revenue, but not less than 40 percent, from mobile sports wagering that the applicant will pay to the state, for the privilege of licensure if chosen and the percentage of overall mobile sports wagering gaming revenue estimated to be generated, for different scenarios for the number of platform providers and mobile sports betting operators licensed by the commission; new text end new text begin (2) the number of mobile sports betting operators the applicant will host on its mobile sports betting platform, if the applicant is licensed as a platform provider; new text end new text begin (3) a description of how the applicant will use technology to ensure all bettors are physically within approved locations within the state, that exclusion lists will be accommodated, and that necessary safeguards against abuses and addictions are in place; new text end new text begin (4) demonstration that the applicant and any anticipated associated operators possess the qualifications, capabilities, and experience to provide a mobile sports wagering platform; new text end new text begin (5) a list of all jurisdictions where the applicant and any parent company, and mobile sports wagering operators and their parent companies, have been licensed or otherwise authorized to conduct sports wagering operations; new text end new text begin (6) information about the platform provider and associated operators model for player acquisition, including details on how the applicant and its associated operators will convert customers from wagering through illegal channels to wagering legally in the state; new text end new text begin (7) the applicant's proposed timeline for implementing mobile sports wagering from the award of a license; and new text end new text begin (8) the applicant's plan for integrity monitoring and reporting, including any current affiliations related to integrity monitoring. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Factors for evaluation. new text end new text begin The commissioner must evaluate each applicant on the following factors to determine the ability of the applicant to maximize sustainable, long-term revenue for the state: new text end new text begin (1) a market analysis detailing the benefits of the applicant's bid with regard to maximizing revenue for the state relative to the amount bet; new text end new text begin (2) estimates of mobile sports betting gross revenue generated by the applicant under different scenarios and with descriptions of relevant assumptions; new text end new text begin (3) the percentage of mobile sports betting net revenue to be paid to the state under different scenarios; new text end new text begin (4) the potential market share of the mobile sports betting operator or operators under different scenarios and with descriptions of relevant assumptions; new text end new text begin (5) plans of the applicant and each associated operator for advertising and promoting mobile sports betting to ensure that they are not overly aggressive in marketing and promotion and to avoid any promotion that increases the scope of problem gambling; new text end new text begin (6) experience and expertise in the market of the applicant and each associated operator; new text end new text begin (7) a demonstration of how and to what degree the applicant fosters racial, ethnic, and gender diversity in its workforce; new text end new text begin (8) a timeline to implement mobile sports betting from award of license; new text end new text begin (9) any other factors that could impact the integrity, sustainability, or safety of mobile sports betting; and new text end new text begin (10) any other factors that could impact revenue to the state. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin License awards to highest scoring applications. new text end new text begin The commissioner must award a license to the two platform providers that meet licensing criteria in sections 299L.25 and 299L.29, and who score the highest in the commissioner's evaluation of the factors in subdivision 4. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Additional licenses. new text end new text begin The commissioner may award additional licenses to platform providers that meet licensing criteria in sections 299L.25 and 299L.29, if the commissioner determines that additional licenses would be in the best interest of the state. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Tax rate. new text end new text begin The tax rate or rates to be paid will be the highest percentage of sports betting net revenue, as defined in section 297J.01, clause (6), from mobile sports wagering that is bid by either of the two highest rated platform providers who are awarded licenses under subdivision 5. All licensed platform providers will pay the same tax rate or rates. The rates bid may vary based on the number of mobile sports betting operators through which the platform provider will contract to offer mobile sports betting. The tax rate as a percentage of sports betting net revenue from mobile sports wagering may not be lower than 40 percent. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Operators. new text end new text begin The commissioner should attempt to ensure that the mobile sports betting operators that meet license requirements under sections 299L.25 and 299L.28 provide mobile sports betting in the state. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [299L.95] FELONY TO COLLUDE OR COOPERATE. new text end new text begin It shall be a felony for two or more platform providers, including those working on their behalf, to communicate in any manner related to anything related to their bids or applications for licenses under this act prior to selection of license awards. new text end